Mississippi, session 2026, HB1240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Secretary of State shall require, at the close of business on each day during the period that in-person absentee voting is conducted, the Office of the Circuit Clerk to cause a daily report to be generated and printed by the OMR equipment tabulating the total number of absentee ballots that were cast in person that day. (2)  The circuit clerk shall make the daily report required under subsection (1) of this section available to the public upon request. SECTION 2.  Section 23-15-507, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 23-15-507.  No OMR equipment shall be acquired or used in accordance with this chapter unless it shall: (a)  Permit eligible voters to vote at any election for all persons for whom they are lawfully entitled to vote; to vote for as many persons for an office as they are lawfully entitled to vote; to vote for or against any ballot initiative, measure or other local issue upon which they are lawfully entitled to vote; (b)  The OMR equipment shall be capable of rejecting choices marked on the ballot if the number of choices exceeds the number that the voter is entitled to vote for the office or on the measure; (c)  Permit each voter, in presidential elections, by one (1) mark to vote for the candidates of that party for President, Vice President, and their presidential electors, or to vote individually for the electors of their choice when permitted by law; (d)  Permit each voter, in other than primary elections, to vote for the nominees of one or more parties and for independent candidates; (e)  Permit each voter to vote for candidates only in the primary in which he or she is qualified to vote; (f)  Permit each voter to vote for persons whose names are not on the printed ballot; (g)  Be suitably designed for the purpose used, of durable construction, and may be used safely, efficiently and accurately in the conduct of elections and the counting of ballots; (h)  Be provided with means for sealing the ballots after the close of the polls; (i)  When properly operated, record correctly and count accurately all votes cast; and (j)  Provide the voter with a set of instructions that will be displayed in such a way that a voter may readily learn the method of voting. SECTION 3.  Section 23-15-519, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 23-15-519.  The poll managers shall prepare a ballot accounting report that documents the number of voters who have voted, as indicated by the receipt book and the number of ballots used in the election.  The poll managers shall place the report in the ballot box, with the seal logs, receipt books, absentee ballots, affidavit ballots, challenged ballots, curbside ballots, emergency ballots, spoiled ballots and unused ballots, which thereupon shall be sealed with a tamper-evident seal, which is a seal that has been designed in such a way to allow someone to easily detect any tampering, so that no additional ballots may be deposited or removed from the ballot box.  The poll managers, while they have possession of the election materials, and the officials in charge of the election, once the poll managers have delivered the ballot box to the counting center or other designated place, shall be required to keep a seal log to document each time a tamper-evident seal for a ballot box is opened or changed.  The seal log shall require the name of the person who opened the seal, the old seal number, the new seal number, the date the seal was opened and the purpose for opening the seal.  The receiving and returning poll manager shall deliver the ballot box to the counting center or other designated place and receive a signed, numbered receipt therefor.  The poll books and other records and supplies shall be returned as directed by the officials in charge of the election.  Failure to strictly comply with the provisions of this section shall not result in a presumption of fraud. SECTION 4.  Section 1 of this act shall be codified as a new Section in Chapter 15, Title 23, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.